Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2317
Underground facility, defined.

Underground facility shall mean any item of personal property buried or placed below ground for use in connection with the storage or conveyance of water, sewage, electronic communications, telephonic communications, telegraphic communications, cable television, electric energy, oil, gas, hazardous liquids, or other substances, including pipes, trunk lines, fiber optic cables, sewers, conduits, cables, valves, lines, wires, manholes, and attachments to such personal property.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 17.